Maryland, session 2025, HB0893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–1210.
(a) (1) In addition to any other penalty or fine provided in this title, a person
who holds an authorization to catch oysters under § 4–701 of this title and receives a
citation for an offense listed under paragraph (2) of this subsection may, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION, have the authorization [revoked in accordance with this section]:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, SUSPENDED FOR UP TO 2 5 YEARS;
AND
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, SUSPENDED
FOR UP TO 10 YEARS REVOKED.
(2) The following offenses, committed in violation of this title or of any
regulation adopted under this title, are grounds for [revocation] SUSPENSION OR
REVOCATION of an authorization to catch oysters under this section:
– 1 –

Ch. 552 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Taking oysters located more than 200 feet within a closed or
prohibited area;
(ii) Taking oysters with gear that is prohibited in that area WHILE
MORE THAN 200 FEET WITHIN THE PROHIBITED AREA;
(iii) Taking oysters outside of a time restriction for the harvest of
oysters by more than 1 hour;
(iv) Taking oysters during closed seasons; and
(v) Taking oysters from a leased area by a person other than the
leaseholder or the leaseholder’s designee.
(b) (1) [(i)] Before the [revocation] SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION of an
authorization to catch oysters under this section, the Department shall hold a hearing on
the matter in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act under Title 10, Subtitle 2
of the State Government Article.
[(ii) A hearing held under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be
held within 90 days after the cited individual commits the offense listed under subsection
(a)(2) of this section.]
(2) After a hearing is conducted under paragraph (1) of this subsection, if
the presiding officer finds or concludes that the person knowingly has committed an offense
listed under subsection (a)(2) of this section, the Department shall [revoke] SUSPEND OR
REVOKE the person’s authorization to catch oysters IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(A)(1) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) A person who is aggrieved by the final decision of the Department may obtain
judicial review of the decision in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act under
Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
(d) A person whose authorization has been [revoked] SUSPENDED OR REVOKED
in accordance with this section may not engage or work in the oyster fishery WHILE
SUSPENDED OR REVOKED whether or not [it] THE WORK requires the use of another
license.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A PERSON’S AUTHORIZATION TO
CATCH OYSTERS THAT WAS REVOKED UNDER THIS SECTION BEFORE JULY 1, 2025.
(2) A PERSON DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL HAVE THEIR ENTITLEMENT TO ENGAGE IN THE OYSTER FISHERY
REINSTATED IF:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 552
(I) 1. THE AUTHORIZATION HAS BEEN REVOKED FOR AT
LEAST 2 YEARS; AND
2. THE REVOCATION WAS THE PERSON’S FIRST OFFENSE
ADJUDICATED AS A KNOWING VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(II) 1. THE AUTHORIZATION HAS BEEN REVOKED FOR AT
LEAST 10 YEARS; AND
2. THE REVOCATION WAS THE PERSON’S SECOND OR
SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE ADJUDICATED AS A KNOWING VIOLATION UNDER THIS
SECTION THE DEPARTMENT MAY ACCEPT AN APPLICATION FOR AND ISSUE AN
OYSTER AUTHORIZATION TO A PERSON WHOSE OYSTER AUTHORIZATION WAS
REVOKED UNDER THIS SECTION BEFORE JULY 1, 2025, BEGINNING 5 YEARS AFTER
THE DATE OF REVOCATION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REINSTATE A PERSON’S ENTITLEMENT
TO ENGAGE OR WORK IN THE OYSTER FISHERY FOR A PERSON WHOSE
AUTHORIZATION TO CATCH OYSTERS WAS REVOKED UNDER THIS SECTION BEFORE
JULY 1, 2025, BEGINNING 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF REVOCATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –